Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [477A.41] STATE FAIRGROUNDS PUBLIC SAFETY AND MUNICIPAL SERVICES AID. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Public safety and municipal services aid; purpose. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of revenue must make aid payments to the city of Falcon Heights and the city of St. Paul. The purpose of the aid is to compensate the cities for costs that are attributable to events occurring at the State Fairgrounds, such as public safety services including police, fire, and emergency medical response; public works expenses for traffic management and sanitation; and neighborhood cleanup and restoration efforts. new text end new text begin (b) For aids payable in 2026, the aid amount for the city of Falcon Heights equals $75,000 and the aid amount for the city of St. Paul equals $500,000. For aids payable in 2027 and thereafter, the aid amount for each city equals the aid payable to each city in the previous year multiplied by the inflation adjustment under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Inflation adjustment. new text end new text begin In January of the year in which the aid amounts are certified, the commissioner of revenue must calculate the inflation adjustment. For purposes of this section, the "inflation adjustment" equals the sum of one plus the rate of change in inflation according to the implicit price deflator for government consumption and expenditures and gross investment for state and local governments prepared by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending March 31 of the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certification and payment. new text end new text begin By August 1 of each year, the commissioner of revenue must certify the amount to be paid to each city in the following year. The commissioner of revenue must make aid payments to the city of Falcon Heights and to the city of St. Paul annually on July 20. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin An amount sufficient to pay aid under this section is appropriated annually from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with aids payable in 2026. new text end